New York, session 2025-2026, S4889.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 1 of the veterans' services law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 3. The term "veteran" means a person who served on active duty in the 4 uniformed services of the United States, or who served in the army 5 national guard, air national guard, New York guard or New York naval 6 militia for at least twenty years of service, part of which was during 7 any war or period of hostilities, or service as a commissioned officer 8 in the public health service, commissioned officer of the national 9 oceanic and atmospheric administration or environmental sciences 10 services administration, cadet at a United States armed forces service 11 academy, and who has been released from such service under other than 12 dishonorable conditions. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09182-01-5